Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2067.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 520.1(a) and (b) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 520.1. Temporary Emergency Provisions.--(a) Whenever an emergency shall arise which the board of school directors of any school district in the performance of its duties could not anticipate or foresee, and which emergency shall result in any such school district being unable to provide for the attendance of all pupils during the prescribed length of school days, number of days per week, or usual hours of classes, 1234567891011121314151617181920 it shall be found as a fact by the school directors of any school district and so recorded on the minutes of a regular or special meeting of such board and certified to the [Superintendent of Public Instruction] Secretary of Education, and such board of school directors, subject to the approval of the [Superintendent of Public Instruction] Secretary of Education, shall have power to put into operation in such school district any one or more of the temporary provisions hereinafter provided for, but in no event shall such temporary provisions remain in effect for a period of more than four years after they are first put into effect.(b) Subject to the foregoing provisions, any board of school directors may:(1) Keep the schools of the district in session such days and number of days per week as they shall deem necessary or desirable, but the provisions of [this act requiring a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) session days as a school year] section 133 shall not be affected thereby.(2) Reduce the length of time of daily instruction for various courses and classes.(3) Transition students to virtual learning either on a full-time or part-time basis.(4) Furlough nonessential employees.* * *(d) If the General Appropriation Act has not been enacted within sixty (60) days of the beginning of a new fiscal year, a board of school directors may declare an emergency under this section at any point thereafter and utilize the provisions of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2067PN2650 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930